Illinois, session 104th, HB2727.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 18a-300 and 18d-115 and by adding Sections 61-129.5, 18d-151, and 18d-152 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/1-129.5 new)8    Sec. 1-129.5. Immediate family or household member. A 9spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandparent, or 10grandchild, whether of the whole blood or half blood or by 11adoption, or a person who shares a common dwelling. 12    (625 ILCS 5/18a-300)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 18a-300)13    Sec. 18a-300. Commercial vehicle relocators - Unlawful 14practices. It shall be unlawful for any commercial vehicle 15relocator:16        (1) To operate in any county in which this Chapter is 17    applicable without a valid, current relocator's license as 18    provided in Article IV of this Chapter;19        (2) To employ as an operator, or otherwise so use the 20    services of, any person who does not have at the 21    commencement of employment or service, or at any time 22    during the course of employment or service, a valid,   HB2727- 2 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1    current operator's employment permit, or temporary 2    operator's employment permit issued in accordance with 3    Sections 18a-403 or 18a-405 of this Chapter; or to fail to 4    notify the Commission, in writing, of any known criminal 5    conviction of any employee occurring at any time before or 6    during the course of employment or service;7        (3) To employ as a dispatcher, or otherwise so use the 8    services of, any person who does not have at the 9    commencement of employment or service, or at any time 10    during the course of employment or service, a valid, 11    current dispatcher's or operator's employment permit or 12    temporary dispatcher's or operator's employment permit 13    issued in accordance with Sections 18a-403 or 18a-407 of 14    this Chapter; or to fail to notify the Commission, in 15    writing, of any known criminal conviction of any employee 16    occurring at any time before or during the course of 17    employment or service;18        (4) To operate upon the highways of this State any 19    vehicle used in connection with any commercial vehicle 20    relocation service unless:21             (A) There is painted or firmly affixed to the 22        vehicle on both sides of the vehicle in a color or 23        colors vividly contrasting to the color of the vehicle 24        the name, address and telephone number of the 25        relocator. The Commission shall prescribe reasonable 26        rules and regulations pertaining to insignia to be   HB2727- 3 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1        painted or firmly affixed to vehicles and shall waive 2        the requirements of the address on any vehicle in 3        cases where the operator of a vehicle has painted or 4        otherwise firmly affixed to the vehicle a seal or 5        trade mark that clearly identifies the operator of the 6        vehicle; and7             (B) There is carried in the power unit of the 8        vehicle a certified copy of the currently effective 9        relocator's license and operator's employment permit. 10        Copies may be photographed, photocopied, or reproduced 11        or printed by any other legible and durable process. 12        Any person guilty of not causing to be displayed a copy 13        of his relocator's license and operator's employment 14        permit may in any hearing concerning the violation be 15        excused from the payment of the penalty hereinafter 16        provided upon a showing that the license was issued by 17        the Commission, but was subsequently lost or 18        destroyed;19        (5) To operate upon the highways of this State any 20    vehicle used in connection with any commercial vehicle 21    relocation service that bears the name or address and 22    telephone number of any person or entity other than the 23    relocator by which it is owned or to which it is leased;24        (6) To advertise in any newspaper, book, list, 25    classified directory or other publication unless there is 26    contained in the advertisement the license number of the   HB2727- 4 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1    relocator;2        (7) To remove any vehicle from private property 3    without having first obtained the written authorization of 4    the property owner or other person in lawful possession or 5    control of the property, his authorized agent, or an 6    authorized law enforcement officer. The authorization may 7    be on a contractual basis covering a period of time or 8    limited to a specific removal;9        (8) To charge the private property owner, who 10    requested that an unauthorized vehicle be removed from his 11    property, with the costs of removing the vehicle contrary 12    to any terms that may be a part of the contract between the 13    property owner and the commercial relocator. Nothing in 14    this paragraph shall prevent a relocator from assessing, 15    collecting, or receiving from the property owner, lessee, 16    or their agents any fee prescribed by the Commission;17        (9) To remove a vehicle when the owner or operator of 18    the vehicle is present or arrives at the vehicle location 19    at any time prior to the completion of removal, and is 20    willing and able to remove the vehicle immediately, except 21    for vehicles that require a commercial driver's license to 22    operate. Vehicles that require a commercial driver's 23    license to operate shall be disconnected from the tow 24    truck and the owner or operator shall be allowed to remove 25    the vehicle without interference upon the payment of a 26    reasonable service fee of not more than one-half of the   HB2727- 5 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1    posted rate of the towing service per tow vehicle on the 2    scene and up to a maximum of 2 tow vehicles as provided in 3    paragraph 6 of subsection (f) of Section 4-203 of this 4    Code, for which a receipt shall be given;5        (10) To remove any vehicle from property on which 6    signs are required and on which there are not posted 7    appropriate signs under Section 18a-302;8        (11) To fail to notify law enforcement authorities in 9    the jurisdiction in which the trespassing vehicle was 10    removed within one hour of the removal. Notification shall 11    include a complete description of the vehicle, 12    registration numbers if possible, the locations from which 13    and to which the vehicle was removed, the time of removal, 14    and any other information required by regulation, statute 15    or ordinance;16        (12) To impose any charge other than in accordance 17    with the rates set by the Commission as provided in 18    paragraph (6) of Section 18a-200 of this Chapter;19        (13) To fail, in the office or location at which 20    relocated vehicles are routinely returned to their owners, 21    to prominently post the name, address and telephone number 22    of the nearest office of the Commission to which inquiries 23    or complaints may be sent;24        (13.1) To fail to distribute to each owner or operator 25    of a relocated vehicle, in written form as prescribed by 26    Commission rule or regulation, the relevant statutes,   HB2727- 6 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1    regulations and ordinances governing commercial vehicle 2    relocators, including, in at least 12 point boldface type, 3    the name, address and telephone number of the nearest 4    office of the Commission to which inquiries or complaints 5    may be sent;6        (13.2) To fail, in the office or location at which 7    relocated vehicles are routinely returned to their owners, 8    to ensure that the relocator's representative provides 9    suitable evidence of his or her identity to the owners of 10    relocated vehicles upon request; 11        (14) To remove any vehicle, otherwise in accordance 12    with this Chapter, more than 15 air miles from its 13    location when towed from a location in an unincorporated 14    area of a county or more than 10 air miles from its 15    location when towed from any other location;16        (15) To fail to make a telephone number available to 17    the police department of any municipality in which a 18    relocator operates at which the relocator or an employee 19    of the relocator may be contacted at any time during the 20    hours in which the relocator is engaged in the towing of 21    vehicles, or advertised as engaged in the towing of 22    vehicles, for the purpose of effectuating the release of a 23    towed vehicle; or to fail to include the telephone number 24    in any advertisement of the relocator's services published 25    or otherwise appearing on or after the effective date of 26    this amendatory Act; or to fail to have an employee   HB2727- 7 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1    available at any time on the premises owned or controlled 2    by the relocator for the purposes of arranging for the 3    immediate release of the vehicle.4        Apart from any other penalty or liability authorized 5    under this Act, if after a reasonable effort, the owner of 6    the vehicle is unable to make telephone contact with the 7    relocator for a period of one hour from his initial 8    attempt during any time period in which the relocator is 9    required to respond at the number, all fees for towing, 10    storage, or otherwise are to be waived. Proof of 3 11    attempted phone calls to the number provided to the police 12    department by an officer or employee of the department on 13    behalf of the vehicle owner within the space of one hour, 14    at least 2 of which are separated by 45 minutes, shall be 15    deemed sufficient proof of the owner's reasonable effort 16    to make contact with the vehicle relocator. Failure of the 17    relocator to respond to the phone calls is not a criminal 18    violation of this Chapter;19        (16) To use equipment which the relocator does not 20    own, except in compliance with Section 18a-306 of this 21    Chapter and Commission regulations. No equipment can be 22    leased to more than one relocator at any time. Equipment 23    leases shall be filed with the Commission. If equipment is 24    leased to one relocator, it cannot thereafter be leased to 25    another relocator until a written cancellation of lease is 26    properly filed with the Commission;  HB2727- 8 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1        (17) To use drivers or other personnel who are not 2    employees or contractors of the relocator;3        (18) To fail to refund any amount charged in excess of 4    the reasonable rate established by the Commission;5        (19) To violate any other provision of this Chapter, 6    or of Commission regulations or orders adopted under this 7    Chapter;8        (20) To engage in the removal of a commercial motor 9    vehicle that requires a commercial driver's license to 10    operate by operating the vehicle under its own power on a 11    highway without authorization by a law enforcement 12    officer. 13        (21) To apply for a new relocator's license while the 14    relocator's license of the applicant, or an entity that 15    the applicant or an immediate family member or household 16    member has an ownership interest in, is suspended.17        (22) To apply for a new relocator's license within 5 18    years after the date when the relocator's license of the 19    applicant or an immediate family member or household 20    member, or an entity that the applicant has an ownership 21    interest in, was revoked.22        (23) To relocate a vehicle of which the commercial 23    vehicle relocator has possession from any premises 24    controlled by the commercial vehicle relocator without:25            (A) providing at least 90 days notice by posting 26        on the premises, visible to the general public, a   HB2727- 9 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1        notice of intent to relocate the vehicle prior to the 2        relocation of the vehicle; and3            (B) providing at least 60 days notice by mail to 4        the registered address of the registered owner or 5        owners of the vehicle prior to the relocation of the 6        vehicle. 7(Source: P.A. 99-438, eff. 1-1-16.) 8    (625 ILCS 5/18d-115)9    Sec. 18d-115. Safety relocator's registration certificate.10    (a) It shall be unlawful for any commercial vehicle safety 11relocator to operate in any county in which this Chapter is 12applicable without a valid, current safety relocator's 13registration certificate issued by the Illinois Commerce 14Commission. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall issue 15safety relocator's registration certificates in accordance 16with administrative rules adopted by the Commission. The 17Commission may, at any time during the term of the 18registration certificate, make inquiry, into the licensee's 19management or conduct of business or otherwise, to determine 20that the provisions of this Chapter and the rules of the 21Commission adopted under this Chapter are being observed.22    (b) It shall be unlawful for any commercial vehicle safety 23relocator to apply for a new safety relocator's registration 24certificate:25        (1) while the safety relocator's registration   HB2727- 10 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1    certificate of the applicant or an immediate family member 2    or household member, or an entity that the applicant has 3    an ownership interest in, is suspended; or4        (2) within 5 years after the date when the safety 5    relocator's registration certificate of the applicant or 6    an immediate family member or household member, or an 7    entity that the applicant has an ownership interest in, 8    was revoked. 9(Source: P.A. 95-562, eff. 7-1-08.) 10    (625 ILCS 5/18d-151 new)11    Sec. 18d-151. Relocation notice requirements. A commercial 12vehicle safety relocator with a safety relocator's 13registration certificate, in order to relocate a vehicle of 14which the commercial vehicle relocator has possession from any 15premises controlled by the commercial vehicle relocator, shall 16provide:17        (1) at least 90 days notice by posting on the 18    premises, visible to the general public, a notice of 19    intent to relocate the vehicle prior to the relocation of 20    the vehicle; and21        (2) at least 60 days notice by mail to the registered 22    address of the registered owner or owners of the vehicle 23    prior to the relocation of the vehicle. 24    (625 ILCS 5/18d-152 new)  HB2727- 11 -LRB104 10196 LNS 20268 b1    Sec. 18d-152. Price list. A commercial vehicle safety 2relocator shall provide a printed legible price list 3indicating both the per mile towing charge and per day storage 4charge to the driver of the vehicle prior to removing the 5vehicle. If the driver of the vehicle cannot be located prior 6to removing the vehicle and the person authorizing the tow is 7not a law enforcement officer, then the price list shall be 8provided to the person authorizing the tow. If the driver of 9the vehicle cannot be located and the person authorizing the 10tow is a law enforcement officer, then the price list shall be 11provided to any other occupant of the vehicle. If the driver of 12the vehicle cannot be located and no occupant of the vehicle is 13present, then the price list shall be mailed within 24 hours to 14the registered address of the registered vehicle owner. If a 15printed price list cannot be provided for any reason other 16than failure of the commercial vehicle safety relocator to 17have a printed list available, then an electronic version may 18be provided.